Maryland, session 2025, HB0167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
13–809.
(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this part, in addition to any other
charge required by the Maryland Vehicle Law, an excise tax is imposed:
(i) For each original and each subsequent certificate of title issued
in this State for a motor vehicle, a trailer, a semitrailer, a moped, a motor scooter, or an
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0167*

HOUSE BILL 167
off–highway recreational vehicle for which sales and use tax is not collected at the time of
purchase; and
(ii) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, for each
motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer that is in interstate operation and registered under §
13–109(c) or (d) of this title without a certificate of title.
(2) (i) An excise tax of $50 is imposed for the registration of a trailer
exempt from the titling requirement under § 13–102(12) of this title.
(ii) In a case where the fair market value as defined in subsection
(a)(2)(iii)2A of this section applies, the excise tax imposed under this part may not be less
than $32.
(3) A political subdivision of the State may not impose a sales tax, a use
tax, or excise tax on the issuance of a motor vehicle certificate of title.
(c) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b)(2) of this section, the tax imposed
by this section is [6 percent] 6.75% of the fair market value of the vehicle.
(2) If the vehicle formerly was a vehicle exempt from the tax imposed by
this section, the tax shall be reduced by any amount previously paid by the present owner
as a sales and use tax on the vehicle under Title 11 of the Tax – General Article.
(3) (i) If the vehicle was formerly titled and registered in another state
and the present owner has paid a sales or excise tax to that state at a rate less than that
imposed by this State, then the tax imposed shall apply but at a rate measured by the
difference only between the tax rate paid to the other state and the tax rate imposed by this
section, if the present owner has not been a Maryland resident for more than 60 days.
(ii) If the vehicle was formerly titled and registered in another state
and the present owner requests to transfer the vehicle in accordance with § 13–810(c)(1) of
this subtitle, the Administration shall change or correct the names contained in the
certificate of title:
1. At the time the excise tax that is credited or imposed
under this section is paid and a new title is issued; and
2. Without issuing multiple certificates of title or charging
additional fees.
(iii) Except as provided in subsection (b)(2) of this section, the
minimum tax imposed under this section shall be $100.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. This Act shall be applicable to all certificates of title issued on or after July 1, 2025,
and to all motor vehicles, trailers, or semitrailers subject to the excise tax that are in

HOUSE BILL 167 3
interstate operation and registered under § 13–109(c) or (d) of the Transportation Article
without a certificate of title on or after July 1, 2025.